District of Columbia statutes.
7-803

Treatment by other than registered physician.

No person other than a registered physician shall treat any case of inflammation of the eyes, attended by a discharge therefrom, of a newborn child for any period longer than may be necessary to obtain the services of a registered physician.

Apr. 27, 1937, 50 Stat. 120, ch. 144, § 3
1981 Ed., § 6-303.
1973 Ed., § 6-203.